Hawaii statutes.
§431:13-107 Commissioner's right of action.
All remedies, penalties and proceedings set forth in this article are to be
invoked solely and exclusively by the commissioner. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Case Notes

See also notes at end of this chapter.

This article does not authorize a private cause of action.
795 F. Supp. 1036.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next